Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB57.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7508(b) and (d) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 7508. Drug trafficking sentencing and penalties.(a) General rule.--Notwithstanding any other provisions of this or any other act to the contrary, the following provisions shall apply:* * *(9) A person who is convicted of violating section 13(a)(14), (30) or (37) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act where the controlled substance or a mixture containing the controlled substance is fentanyl or a fentanyl derivative, compound or analogue as set forth in section 4(1)123456789101112131415161718 (ii)(23) or (2)(ii)(6) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment and a fine as set forth in this paragraph:(i) when the aggregate weight of the compound or mixture containing the fentanyl or fentanyl derivative, compound or analogue involved is less than 1.0 gram; two years in prison and a fine of $5,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity; however, if at the time of sentencing the defendant has been convicted of another drug trafficking offense: 36 months in prison and a fine of $10,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity;(ii) when the aggregate weight of the compound or mixture containing the fentanyl or fentanyl derivative, compound or analogue involved is at least 1.0 gram but less than ten grams; three years in prison and a fine of $15,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity; however, if at the time of sentencing the defendant has been convicted of another drug trafficking offense: 48 months in prison and a fine of $30,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity;(iii) when the aggregate weight of the compound or mixture containing the fentanyl or fentanyl derivative, compound or analogue involved is at least ten grams but less than 50 grams; 54 months in prison and a fine of 20250HB0057PN0047 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $25,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity; however, if at the time of sentencing the defendant has been convicted of another drug trafficking offense: 66 months in prison and a fine of $50,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity;(iv) when the aggregate weight of the compound or mixture containing the fentanyl or fentanyl derivative, compound or analogue involved is at least 50 grams but less than 100 grams; 78 months in prison and a fine of $25,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity; however, if at the time of sentencing the defendant has been convicted of another drug trafficking offense: 90 months in prison and a fine of $50,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity; or(v) when the aggregate weight of the compound or mixture containing the fentanyl or fentanyl derivative, compound or analogue involved is at least 100 grams; 96 months in prison and a fine of $25,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity; however, if at the time of sentencing the defendant has been convicted of another drug trafficking offense: 108 months in prison and a fine of $50,000 or such larger amount as is sufficient to exhaust the assets utilized in and the proceeds from the illegal activity.20250HB0057PN0047 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(b) [Proof of sentencing.--Provisions of this section shall not be an element of the crime. Notice of the applicability of this section to the defendant shall not be required prior to conviction, but reasonable notice of the Commonwealth's intention to proceed under this section shall be provided after conviction and before sentencing. The applicability of this section shall be determined at sentencing. The court shall consider evidence presented at trial, shall afford the Commonwealth and the defendant an opportunity to present necessary additional evidence and shall determine, by a preponderance of the evidence, if this section is applicable.] Application of mandatory minimum penalty.--With the exception of prior convictions, any provision of this section that requires imposition of a mandatory minimum sentence shall constitute an element enhancing the underlying offense. Any enhancing element must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt at trial on the underlying offense and must be submitted to the finder of fact for deliberation together with the underlying offense. If the finder of fact finds the defendant guilty of the underlying offense, the finder of fact shall then also decide whether any enhancing element has been proven.* * *(d) [Appellate review.--If a sentencing court refuses to apply this section where applicable, the Commonwealth shall have the right to appellate review of the action of the sentencing court. The appellate court shall vacate the sentence and remand the case to the sentencing court for imposition of a sentence in accordance with this section if it finds that the sentence was imposed in violation of this section.] Appeal by Commonwealth.--20250HB0057PN0047 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 If the finder of fact has found any enhancing element and a sentencing court imposes a sentence below the mandatory minimum sentence, the Commonwealth shall have the right to appellate review of the sentence. If the appellate court finds that the mandatory sentencing provision was applicable, the court shall vacate the sentence and remand the case for resentencing in accordance with that provision.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0057PN0047 - 5 - 123456789